Kentucky statutes. TITLE XII Conservation and State Development
Kentucky Economic Opportunity Zone Act
154.23-045.
Application of eligible company to become approved company and expand existing business — Base levels for eligible credits — Exemption of employees from assessment — Increase in number of employees at site — Tax — Additional agreements.

If an eligible company operates an existing business in a qualified zone, and wishes to expand that business within the zone, the eligible company may submit an application to the authority to become an approved company under KRS 154.23-025.

If the eligible company under subsection (1) of this section becomes an approved company, the authority shall determine a base level of employment in the Commonwealth, a base level of state income tax liability, a base level of limited liability entity tax liability under KRS 141.0401, and a base level of manufacturing or service or technology activity, as applicable, of the approved company for determining eligible credits for the approved company’s project during the term of a tax incentive agreement or service and technology agreement. The base level shall be determined by taking into consideration any seasonal fluctuations or aberrations of employment levels during the preceding three (3) years. Notwithstanding the determination of a base level of employment in the Commonwealth, no qualified statewide employee who is an employee of this business prior to the date of the preliminary approval by the authority as prescribed in KRS 154.23-030 shall be subject to assessment.

The authority shall identify, by name, all of the existing qualified statewide employees employed by the eligible company prior to preliminary approval, and these employees shall be exempt from the assessment. If any of these employees cease working in the activity, then another qualified statewide employee shall be added to the base level of employment, based on the earliest date of entry into the workforce, and this employee shall be exempt from the assessment. The authority may negotiate with the approved company a different method of determining the base level of employment that would yield a more equitable result for the approved company, the Commonwealth, local jurisdictions, and the qualified statewide employees.

To become eligible for inducements, the approved company shall create and maintain above the base level of employment in the Commonwealth, an increase at the site of the project of at least ten (10) new full-time qualified employees.

The approved company shall continue to pay to the Commonwealth, on an annualized basis during the term of the tax incentive agreement or service and technology agreement, as applicable, the base level of income tax, and the limited liability entity tax imposed under KRS 141.0401, adjusted on an annual basis to reflect changes in the consumer price index. The excess income tax and limited liability entity tax imposed under KRS 141.0401 owed may be offset by the income tax credit provided in KRS 154.23-050.

If any approved company expands in a qualified zone because of an increase in business or because of the commencement of a new line of business, it may be eligible, at the discretion of the authority, to negotiate a separate, additional tax incentive agreement or service and technology agreement to cover the expanded business under the same conditions as authorized for an expansion in this section.

History.
Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 528, § 9, effective July 14, 2000; 2002, ch. 338, § 30, effective July 15, 2002; 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 2, § 49, effective June 28, 2006.

154.23-050.
Tax credit for approved company engaged in manufacturing, service, or technology activities — Reports by Department of Revenue to authority.

An approved company engaged in manufacturing or in service or technology activities shall be entitled to a tax credit equal to one hundred percent (100%) of the income tax liability and one hundred percent (100%) of the limited liability entity tax liability imposed under KRS 141.0401 that would otherwise be due to the Commonwealth from the approved company attributable to its economic development project, as limited by the provisions of KRS 154.23-045. The ordering of the credits shall be as provided in KRS 141.0205.

The Department of Revenue of the Commonwealth shall initiate contact and fully cooperate with the authority in the collection of information to determine the fiscal impact of qualified zone inducements on state revenues. The Department of Revenue shall certify to the authority, in the form of an annual report, aggregate tax credits and assessments taken by approved companies with respect to their economic development projects under KRS 154.23-005 to 154.23-079, and certify to the authority when an approved company has taken tax credits and assessments equal to its total inducements. The Department of Revenue shall certify to the authority, upon written request of the authority, the aggregate tax credits and assessments taken by an approved company with respect to its economic development project under KRS 154.23-005 to 154.23-079.

History.
Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 528, § 10, effective July 14, 2000; 2005, ch. 85, § 579, effective June 20, 2005; 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 2, § 50, effective June 28, 2006.

154.23-055.
Assessment based on employee’s gross wages — Amount — Credits against taxes and fees — Prorating of credits and assessments against occupational license fees — Availability of records — Approval of assessment by local government — Cessation of assessments.

If the local jurisdiction in which the economic development project is to be located approves the assessment in accordance with subsection (8) of this section, then an approved company engaged in either manufacturing or service or technology activities or, with the authority’s consent, an affiliate of the approved company, may require each qualified statewide employee, as a condition to employment, to agree to pay an assessment in an amount determined by the percentage of the local occupational license fee, which shall be one-fifth (1/5) of the total assessment, plus the Commonwealth’s contribution of four-fifths (4/5) of the total assessment, but in no event to exceed five percent (5%) of the qualified statewide employee’s gross wages exclusive of any noncash benefits; provided that each qualified statewide employee paying the assessment shall be entitled to credits against Kentucky income tax as prescribed in subsection (4) of this section and to credits against the local occupational license fee to the extent of the local occupational license fee collected by the local jurisdiction. This assessment shall be deducted by the approved company from wages it pays to qualified statewide employees.

Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, if no local occupational license fee is assessed by any local government in which the project is located, the assessment shall be four percent (4%), all of which shall be contributed by the Commonwealth.

Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, if a project is located in only one (1) local government and that local government has a local occupational license fee that is less than one percent (1%) and the local government agrees to forgo all of its local occupational license fee or if a project is located in multiple local governments and the local governments have in the aggregate local occupational license fees that are less than one percent (1%) and the local governments agree to forgo all of their local occupational license fees, then the assessment shall be four percent (4%), all of which shall be contributed by the Commonwealth, plus the percentage of the local occupational license fee or fees, as applicable, that the local government or local governments, as applicable, has or have agreed to forgo.

Each qualified statewide employee required to pay this assessment shall be entitled to certain credits, as follows:

Credit against the required Kentucky income tax withheld from gross wages under KRS 141.310 equal to the Commonwealth’s contribution, but in no event to exceed four percent (4%) of these wages; and

Credit against the local occupational license fee imposed by any local government in which the project is located in the form of a simultaneous adjustment of the local occupational license fee withheld from gross wages excluding noncash benefits not to exceed one percent (1%) of these wages.

If more than one (1) local government jurisdiction imposes a local occupational license fee and all jurisdictions approve the assessment, then the assessment and employee credit therefor shall be prorated against the local occupational license fees imposed, unless a single local government jurisdiction agrees to forgo receipt of its local occupational license fees in an amount equal to one percent (1%) of the qualified statewide employees’ wages excluding noncash benefits, in which case no proration need be made.

No credit, or portion thereof, shall be allowed against any occupational license fee imposed by or dedicated solely to the board of education in a local jurisdiction.

An approved company that collects an assessment shall make its payroll, books, and records available to the authority at its request, and shall provide all documentation pertaining to the assessment as the authority may require.

Before any tax incentive agreement or service and technology agreement becomes effective with respect to an assessment, the legislative body of any local government that assesses a local occupational license fee and shall lose revenue as a result of the assessment described in this section shall, by official action, approve the assessment for the benefit of an approved company. However, if a local government does not approve the assessment, then the approved company shall not be permitted to impose the assessment and the qualified statewide employees shall not be permitted to claim credits.

Any assessment of the wages of qualified statewide employees of an approved company engaged in service or technology activities in connection with their employment at an economic development project shall permanently cease at the expiration of the service and technology agreement.

History.
Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 528, § 11, effective July 14, 2000; 2002, ch. 338, § 31, effective July 15, 2002; 2004, ch. 105, § 9, effective July 13, 2004.

154.23-060.
Applications for grant funds — Approved company may apply inducements toward purchase price of property and improvements.

Any county, urban-county government, or city of the first class for which the authority has certified a qualified zone may also apply for grant funds to be used for acquisition of and infrastructure improvements to real estate for economic development purposes and construction and installation for industry of buildings and fixtures.

In addition to the inducements taken, an approved company may apply the amount of the inducements taken towards the purchase price of real estate, infrastructure improvements, buildings, and fixtures purchased, as set forth in subsection (1) of this section, by any county, urban-county government, or city of the first class. For these inducements taken to apply to the purchase price, the approved company shall have taken inducements equal to a minimum of fifty percent (50%) of the original cost of this real estate, infrastructure improvements, buildings, and fixtures.

History.
Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 528, § 12, effective July 14, 2000.

154.23-065.
Wage subsidies for recipients of Kentucky Transitional Assistance Program.

Approved companies under KRS 154.23-005 to 154.23-079 that hire and employ Kentucky Transitional Assistance Program (K-TAP) recipients on a full-time basis shall be eligible, to the extent funds are available, to receive wage subsidies from the Kentucky Cabinet for Health and Family Services in KRS Chapter 205, Title IV-A of the Federal Social Security Act (Subchapter 4 of Chapter 7 of Title 42, United States Code), and the administrative regulations of the Cabinet for Health and Family Services that address standards and eligibility requirements for K-TAP and subsidized employment.

The wage subsidy for a K-TAP recipient shall be equal to a proportionate amount of the prevailing wage paid by the approved company to all other employees in the same job classification as the K-TAP recipient for one (1) year as follows:

A seventy-five percent (75%) subsidy for the first four (4) months of employment;

A fifty percent (50%) subsidy for the next four (4) months of employment; and

A twenty-five percent (25%) subsidy for the next four (4) months of employment.

During the period of the wage subsidy, the Cabinet for Health and Family Services shall reimburse the employer contribution for FICA and Unemployment Insurance made on behalf of K-TAP recipients.

The Cabinet for Health and Family Services shall collect information to determine the eligibility of recipients and the availability of this subsidy for approved companies.

History.
Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 528, § 13, effective July 14, 2000; 2005, ch. 99, § 124, effective June 20, 2005.

154.23-070.
Administrative regulations.

The authority shall establish the procedures and standards for certification of qualified zones, and determination and approval of eligible companies and their projects by the promulgation of administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A.

History.
Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 528, § 14, effective July 14, 2000.

154.23-075.
Exemption from personal liability for directors and officers of authority.

No director or officer of the authority shall be subject to any personal liability or accountability by reason of the execution of any financing agreement or service and technology agreement on behalf of the authority.

History.
Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 528, § 15, effective July 14, 2000.

154.23-079.
Short title.

KRS 154.23-005 to 154.23-079 shall be known as the Kentucky Economic Opportunity Zone Act.

History.
Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 528, § 16, effective July 14, 2000.

154.23-080.
Deadline for new applications — Governing law for outstanding approved projects.

New applications shall not be accepted or considered under this subchapter on or after June 26, 2009. All outstanding projects with preliminary or final approval under this subchapter as of June 26, 2009, shall continue to be governed by the provisions of this subchapter.

History.
Enact. Acts 2009 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 26, effective June 26, 2009.